Nebraska, session 109, LB1170.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1170 LB1170
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 81-8,236, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
81-8,236 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Correctional institution incident means an incident in which a
crime or crimes are allegedly committed by one or more inmates confined
in a state correctional institution;
(b) Costs of prosecution includes, but is not limited to, the costs
of defense for indigent defendants, including attorney's fees and expert
witness fees;
(c) Division means the risk management and state claims division of
the Department of Administrative Services; and
(d) Threshold amount means the amount of property tax revenue raised
by a county from a levy of two and one-half cents per one hundred dollars
of taxable valuation of property subject to the levy. The threshold
amount shall be determined using valuations for the year in which the
correctional institution incident occurred.
(2) A county may file a claim with the division to recover the costs
of prosecution relating to a correctional institution incident that
occurs within the county. The county may recover only those costs that
exceed the threshold amount for such county. A county may file more than
one claim for a single correctional institution incident if the threshold
amount is met for each claim or prosecution has resolved. No claim shall
include prosecution costs for which the Risk Manager has issued a
decision pursuant to section 81-8,300.
(3) The Risk Manager shall have the power and authority to receive
claims, investigate claims, and otherwise carry out the responsibilities
of this section. The division shall develop a claim form, publish claim
procedures, and determine the supporting information required to perfect
a claim.
(4) The Risk Manager shall submit claims received under this section
to the Legislature in the same manner as provided in the State
-2-

LB1170 LB1170
2026 2026
Miscellaneous Claims Act. The Legislature shall review the claim and make
an appropriation for the claim if appropriate.
(5) This section shall apply to any correctional institution
incident occurring on or after May 1, 2015. Claims described in this
section shall have no time bar to recovery.
Sec. 2. Section 81-8,300, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-8,300 (1) After investigation, the Risk Manager or State Claims
Board shall either approve, approve with conditions or limitations, or
disapprove of each claim or request and append to the claim or request a
concise statement of the facts brought out in such investigation upon
which its approval or disapproval is based. If any claim is approved in
an amount of more than five thousand dollars, the approval of the board
is required. Such claim or request, together with the original papers
supporting it and the appended statement, shall be filed with the Risk
Manager in the manner prescribed by the State Claims Board. The Risk
Manager shall promptly notify each claimant of the decision by the Risk
Manager or State Claims Board on his or her claim by regular mail. The
notification shall include (a) the decision of the Risk Manager or State
Claims Board, (b) a statement that a claimant dissatisfied with the
decision of the Risk Manager may have his or her claim reviewed by the
board or a statement that a claimant dissatisfied with the decision of
the board may have his or her claim reviewed by the Legislature upon
application, (c) the procedure for making an application for review, and
(d) the time limit for making such application.
(2) If the claimant is dissatisfied with the decision of the Risk
Manager, he or she may file an application for review by the board. If
the claimant is dissatisfied with the decision of the board, he or she
may file an application for review by the Legislature. The application
for review shall be filed with the Risk Manager in the manner prescribed
by the board. The application for review shall be filed within sixty days
-3-

LB1170 LB1170
2026 2026
after the date of the decision which is being reviewed.
(3) Each claim which has been approved or for which an application
for review with the Legislature has been filed and each request referred
to in section 81-8,297 shall be delivered electronically by the Risk
Manager to the chairperson of the Business and Labor Committee of the
Legislature at the next regular session of the Legislature convening
after the date of the decision of the board. The Risk Manager may direct
the payment by the state agency involved of any claim not in excess of
five thousand dollars if such payment is agreed to by the head of the
agency involved. The State Claims Board may direct payment by the state
agency involved of any claim not in excess of fifty thousand dollars if
such payment is agreed to by the head of the agency involved and the
agency has sufficient funds to pay the claim. If claims approved by the
Risk Manager or State Claims Board arise out of the same facts and
circumstances, they shall be aggregated except when more than one claim
has been filed pursuant to subsection (2) of section 81-8,236. If the
Risk Manager or State Claims Board does not direct the payment of a claim
as set forth in this section or the claim exceeds the dollar limitations
set forth in this section, the claim shall be reviewed by the Legislature
and an appropriation made therefor if appropriate. The Risk Manager shall
report electronically all claims and judgments paid under the State
Miscellaneous Claims Act to the Clerk of the Legislature and the
chairperson of the Business and Labor Committee of the Legislature. The
report shall include the name of the claimant, a statement of the amount
claimed and paid, and a brief description of the claim including the
agency and program or activity under which the claim arose. Any member of
the Legislature may receive an electronic copy of the report by making a
request to the Risk Manager.
Sec. 3. Section 81-8,316, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-8,316 For purposes of the In the Line of Duty Compensation Act:
-4-

LB1170 LB1170
2026 2026
(1) Firefighter means a member of a paid or volunteer fire
department in Nebraska, including a member of a rescue squad associated
with a paid or volunteer fire department in Nebraska;
(2)(a) Killed in the line of duty means losing one's life as a
result of an injury or illness arising on or after January 1, 2022, in
connection with the active performance of duties as a public safety
officer if the death occurs within three years from the date the injury
was received or illness was diagnosed and if that injury or illness arose
from violence or other accidental cause.
(b) An injury or illness shall be presumed to have arisen in
connection with the active performance of duties as a public safety
officer if:
(i) The injury or illness is a heart attack, stroke, or vascular
rupture that occurred or the symptoms of such injury or illness
manifested while the public safety officer was engaged in, or within
twenty-four hours after, nonroutine stressful or strenuous activity in
the line of duty;
(ii) The public safety officer was exposed to any toxin or
carcinogen while on duty and the public safety officer began service no
fewer than five years prior to the date of a diagnosis of an exposure-
related cancer; or
(iii) The public safety officer was exposed to cumulative traumatic
events while on duty, such exposure was a substantial contributing factor
in the death of the public safety officer, and either:
(A) The public safety officer was diagnosed by a licensed medical or
mental health professional with an injury or illness related to such
exposure; or
(B) There is evidence that the public safety officer attempted to
receive help, treatment, or diagnosis for an injury or illness related to
such exposure.
(c)(i) The presumption in subdivision (2)(b)(i) of this section may
-5-

LB1170 LB1170
2026 2026
be overcome by competent medical evidence that establishes the death was:
(A) Unrelated to the engagement or participation in activities in
the line of duty; or
(B) Caused by something other than such engagement or participation
or the mere presence of cardiovascular disease risk factors.
(ii) The presumption in subdivision (2)(b)(ii) of this section may
be overcome by competent medical evidence that establishes the exposure
to the toxin or carcinogen was not a substantial contributing factor in
the death of the public safety officer.
(d) (b) Killed in the line of duty excludes death resulting from the
willful misconduct or intoxication of the public safety officer;
(3) Law enforcement officer has the same meaning as in section
81-1401;
(4) Public safety officer means:
(a) A firefighter;
(b) A law enforcement officer;
(c) A member of an emergency medical services ambulance squad
operated by a political subdivision or by a private, nonprofit ambulance
service, but excluding any employee of a private, for-profit ambulance
service; or
(d) A correctional officer employed by a jail or by the Department
of Correctional Services;
(5) Risk Manager means the Risk Manager appointed under section
81-8,239.01; and
(6) State Claims Board means the board created under section
81-8,220.
Sec. 4. Section 81-8,318, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-8,318 (1) To receive compensation under the In the Line of Duty
Compensation Act, a claim for the compensation shall be filed with the
Risk Manager within three years after the date of death of the public
-6-

LB1170 LB1170
2026 2026
safety officer who was killed in the line of duty. Such claim shall be on
a form prescribed by the Risk Manager and shall include:
(a) The name, address, and title or position of the public safety
officer who was killed in the line of duty;
(b) A copy of the form filed in accordance with subsection (4) of
section 81-8,317, if any. If no such form has been filed, the claim shall
include the name and address of the person or persons to whom
compensation is payable under subdivision (3)(b) of section 81-8,317;
(c) A sworn statement providing a full factual account of the
circumstances resulting in or the course of events causing the death of
the public safety officer; and
(d) Such other information as the Risk Manager reasonably requires.
(2) The Risk Manager shall send written notice to all claimants
within two weeks after the initiation of a claim indicating whether or
not the claim is complete. For purposes of this subsection, a claim is
complete if a claimant has submitted to the Risk Manager all documents
and information required under subsection (1) of this section. If a claim
is incomplete, the Risk Manager shall include in the written notice a
list of the documents or information which the claimant must submit in
order for the claim to be complete. If a claim is complete, an
investigation of the claim shall be made in the manner provided in the
State Miscellaneous Tort Claims Act in accordance with section 81-8,212.
Upon completion of such investigation, and no later than one hundred
eighty days after receipt of a complete claim, the State Claims Board
shall approve or deny such claim and the Risk Manager shall send written
notice to the claimant stating whether the claim has been approved or
denied. If a claim is denied, the notice shall include the reason or
reasons for the denial. If a claimant is dissatisfied with a denial, he
or she may file an application for review with the Risk Manager in
accordance with subsection (2) of section 81-8,300 district court for
Lancaster County in accordance with sections 81-8,213 and 81-8,214. If a
-7-

LB1170 LB1170
2026 2026
claim is approved, compensation shall be paid to the claimants entitled
to such compensation in accordance with section 81-8,300 81-8,211.
(3) This section shall apply to any claim arising on or after
January 1, 2022.
Sec. 5. Original sections 81-8,236, 81-8,300, 81-8,316, and
81-8,318, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-8-